Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Additional Revenue-Producing Projects
[Repealed]

§§ 31-11-111 through 31-11-139.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-11-111. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-61; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 15, § 1; 1966, Ex Sess ch. 40, § 1]

§31-11-113. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-62; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 15, § 2; 1966, Ex Sess ch. 40, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 508, § 1]

§§31-11-115 through31-11-135. [Codes, 1942, §§ 9023-63 to 9023-72; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 15, §§ 3-12]

§31-11-137. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-73; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 15, § 13; Laws, 1983, ch. 313, § 2]

§31-11-139. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-74; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 15, § 14]